Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.205

In-class education requirements.

(1) An applicant for a journey level certificate of competency under RCW 19.28.191(1)(c) or a specialty electrician certificate of competency under RCW 19.28.191(1)(d) must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department completion of in-class education as follows:

(a) Twenty-four hours of in-class education if two thousand hours or more but less than four thousand hours of work are required for the certificate;

(b) Forty-eight hours of in-class education if four thousand or more but less than six thousand hours of work are required for the certificate;

(c) Seventy-two hours of in-class education if six thousand or more but less than eight thousand hours of work are required for the certificate;

(d) Ninety-six hours of in-class education if eight thousand or more hours of work are required for the certificate.

(2) For purposes of this section, "in-class education" means approved classroom training covering this chapter, the national electric code, or electrical theory; or equivalent classroom training taken as part of an approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04 RCW or an approved electrical training program under RCW 19.28.191(1)(e).

(3) Classroom training taken to qualify for trainee certificate renewal under RCW 19.28.161 qualifies as in-class education under this section.

[ 2018 c 249 s 3; 2013 c 23 s 32; 2012 c 32 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 249: See note following RCW 19.28.191.

Effective date—2012 c 32: "This act takes effect July 1, 2013." [ 2012 c 32 s 4.]